Texas statutes.
NATURAL RESOURCES CODE

TITLE 3. OIL AND GAS

SUBTITLE A. ADMINISTRATION

CHAPTER 82. ENFORCEMENT OF FEDERAL LAWS

Sec. 82.0101. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "oil and gas operation" has the meaning assigned by Section 81.0523.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 897 (H.B. 33), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 82.0102. ENFORCEMENT OF CERTAIN FEDERAL LAWS REGULATING OIL AND GAS OPERATIONS. (a) An agency of this state or a person employed by an agency of this state may not contract with or in any other manner provide assistance to a federal agency or official with respect to the enforcement of a federal statute, order, rule, or regulation purporting to regulate oil and gas operations if the statute, order, rule, or regulation imposes a prohibition, restriction, or other regulation that does not exist under the laws of this state.

(b) The attorney general shall defend any agency of this state that the federal government attempts to sue for an action or omission consistent with the requirements of this section.

(c) This section does not prohibit a state agency from:

(1) implementing a federal law by executing authority delegated to the state agency by a federal agency; or

(2) entering into a memorandum of understanding with a federal agency to implement a federal law, if otherwise authorized by state law.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 897 (H.B. 33), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.